Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin UJAMAA PLACE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Ujamaa Place to provide workforce development services targeted to the needs of African American men, including job training, employment preparation, internships, education, and vocational housing, as well as for organizational capacity building. new text end